Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Certification of Asbestos Workers.

Sec. 18.31.200.
Certification programs.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall

establish guidelines for employee training certification programs, including respiratory and competency tests to be completed successfully, to ensure that a person who is employed to abate asbestos health hazards is trained to do the work safely and is informed about the danger of working with asbestos;

review certification programs proposed by contractors, labor organizations, public and private vocational training programs, and others for persons who will be employed to abate asbestos health hazards;

approve proposed certification programs that meet the department’s guidelines under this subsection;

assist in meeting the certification guidelines those whose certification program proposals have been found unacceptable.

Before a contractor may undertake work to abate an asbestos related health hazard, the contractor shall

propose to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development a plan for the certification of its employees as adequately trained to handle asbestos in a safe and knowledgeable way;

receive approval from the department of that plan; and

certify that each person who will work on the abatement of an asbestos health hazard is adequately trained to handle asbestos in a safe and knowledgeable way.

A person may not be employed to abate an asbestos health hazard unless the person has been certified in a program approved by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development under (a) of this section.

A contractor who violates (b) or (c) of this section is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000, as determined by the commissioner of labor and workforce development.

A contractor who violates (b) of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A contractor who violates (c) of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall adopt by regulation a fee schedule for

review, approval, and certification of asbestos training certification programs and plans under this section; and

certification of a person employed to abate an asbestos health hazard.

History.

(§ 2 ch 71 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 2 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 18.28.200.
Renumbered in 1985.

In 1999, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For asbestos abatement certification, see 8 AAC 61, art. 8.